Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.1822

Annexation of unincorporated island of territory—Notice, hearing.

On the date set for hearing as provided in RCW 35.13.182(2), residents or property owners of the area included in the resolution for annexation shall be afforded an opportunity to be heard. The legislative body may provide by ordinance for annexation of the territory described in the resolution, but the effective date of the ordinance shall be not less than forty-five days after the passage thereof. The legislative body shall cause notice of the proposed effective date of the annexation, together with a description of the property to be annexed, to be published at least once each week for two weeks subsequent to passage of the ordinance, in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the city and in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the area to be annexed. If the annexation ordinance provides for assumption of indebtedness or adoption of a proposed zoning regulation, the notice shall include a statement of such requirements.

[ 1998 c 286 s 3.]